Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 56. Oil and Gas Exploration, Production, and Pipeline Transportation Property Taxes.

Cross references. —

For a provision requesting the governor to establish an advisory planning group under AS

44.19.145

to advise the governor on municipal involvement in a North Slope natural gas project and outlining duties and annual reporting requirements for that advisory planning group, including recommendations for changes to the oil and gas exploration, production, and pipeline transportation property taxes under this chapter related to “infrastructure for commercialization of natural gas that would facilitate development of a major natural gas project and mitigate financial impacts to communities affected by development of a North Slope natural gas project” see sec. 74, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Collateral references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§
157, 343, 520.

84 C.J.S., Taxation, §§ 92-95, 437-439, 554-560.

Constitutional exemption from taxation as subject to legislative regulation respecting conditions of its assertion. 4 ALR2d 744.

Loading or unloading interstate freight in performance of obligation resting upon one other than interstate carrier as interstate commerce as regards local taxation. 10 ALR2d 651.

Property destined for, or in course of, removal from state as subject to taxation therein.
11 ALR2d 938.

Power to remit, release, or compromise tax claim.
28 ALR2d 1425.

Validity, construction, and effect of statutes providing for urban redevelopment by private enterprise.
44 ALR2d 1414.

When right to refund of state or local taxes accrues, within statute limiting time for applying for refund. 46 ALR2d 1350, 14 ALR6th 119.

Legislative power to exempt from taxation property, purposes, or uses additional to those specified in constitution. 61 ALR2d 1031.

Financial hardship or inability to pay taxes as rendering inapplicable statutes denying remedy by injunction against assessment or collection of tax. 65 ALR2d 550.

Right of property taxpayer to recover back taxes voluntarily but mistakenly paid a second or successive time. 84 ALR2d 1133.

Transportation, freight, mailing, or handling charges billed separately to purchaser of goods as subject to sales or use taxes. 2 ALR4th 1124

Construction and operation of statutory time limit for filing claim for state tax refund. 14 ALR6th 119.

Sec. 43.56.010.
Levy of tax.

An annual tax of 20 mills is levied each tax year beginning January 1, 1974, on the full and true value of taxable property taxable under this chapter.

A municipality may levy and collect a tax under AS

29.45.080

at the rate of taxation that applies to other property taxed by the municipality. The tax shall be levied at a rate no higher than the rate applicable to other property taxable by the municipality. A municipality may not exempt from taxation property authorized to be taxed under this chapter. Exemptions shall be limited to those in AS

29.45.030

,

29.45.050

, and AS

43.56.020

.

If the total value of assessed property of a municipality taxing under AS

29.45.080(c)

exceeds the product of the percentage, as determined in AS

29.45.080(f)

, of the average per capita assessed full and true value of property in the state, to be determined by the department and reported to each municipality by January 15 of each year, multiplied by the number of residents of the taxing municipality, the department shall designate the portion of the tax base against which the local tax may be applied.

A tax paid to a municipality under AS

29.45.080

or former AS 29.53.045 on or before June 30 of the tax year shall be credited against the tax levied under (a) of this section for that tax year. If, however, a tax is not paid to a municipality until after June 30 of the taxable year, the department upon application shall refund to the taxpayer the amount of tax paid to the municipality under AS

29.45.080

or former AS 29.53.045. The credit or refund of taxes paid to a municipality may not exceed the total amount of tax levied by the department upon the taxpayer for the tax year, under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 7 ch 159 SLA 1975; am §§ 1, 2 ch 107 SLA 1976; am §§ 69 — 71 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 66 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Municipal tax ordinance which established three differential tax zones but levied a higher mill rate in Tax Zone III, a zone consisting entirely of oil and gas property owned by Alyeska and assessed by the State of Alaska, Department of Revenue, under AS 43.56, violated the uniform rate provision of subsection (b). December 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

In the event that creation of a tax zone consisting entirely of oil and gas property was proper and was thereby taxed at a higher mill rate than other property in the city under AS

29.45.580

because it received different services than those generally provided in the city, the municipality’s collection of the higher tax from Alyeska in 1986 failed to meet the requirement of a rational relationship between the benefits conferred and the costs to the taxpayer in 1986. December 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

AS 43.56 property annexed to a municipality after the statutorily prescribed January 1 property assessment deadline, but before a municipality finalizes its tax roll, is taxable under AS

29.45.080

and the tax paid to the municipality will be a credit against that oil company’s corporate state tax for that year under subsection (d) of this section. March 1, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.56.018.
Property tax education credit.

The owner of property taxable under this chapter is allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter for contributions of cash or equipment accepted for

direct instruction, research, and educational support purposes, including library and museum acquisitions, and contributions to endowment, by an Alaska university foundation or by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association;

secondary school level vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a school district in the state;

vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a state-operated vocational technical education and training school;

a facility by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association;

Alaska Native cultural or heritage programs and educational support, including mentoring and tutoring, provided by a nonprofit agency for public school staff and for students who are in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state;

education, research, rehabilitation, and facilities by an institution that is located in the state and that qualifies as a coastal ecosystem learning center under the Coastal America Partnership established by the federal government; and

the Alaska higher education investment fund under AS

37.14.750

.

The amount of the credit is 50 percent of contributions.

Each public college and university shall include in its annual operating budget request contributions received and how the contributions were used.

A contribution claimed as a credit under this section may not

be the basis for a credit claimed under another provision of this title; and

when combined with contributions that are the basis for credits taken during the taxpayer’s tax year under AS

21.96.070

, AS

43.20.014

, AS

43.55.019

, AS

43.65.018

, AS

43.75.018

, or AS

43.77.045

, result in the total amount of credits exceeding $1,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $1,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.145

.

The credit under this section may not reduce a person’s tax liability under this chapter to below zero for any tax year. An unused credit or portion of a credit not used under this section for a tax year may not be sold, traded, transferred, or applied in a subsequent tax year.

To qualify for a credit under this section, equipment must be appraised consistent with regulations adopted by the department to determine the value of the contribution for purposes of this section.

In this section,

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

;

“vocational education” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 58 SLA 1987; am § 50 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 6, 7, 12 ch 71 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 21 SLA 1994; am § 19 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 18 ch 81 SLA 1996; am §§ 5, 6 ch 86 SLA 2000; am §§ 13, 14 ch 46 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 48 SLA 2008; am §§ 27, 29, 31, 33 ch 92 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 9 ch 6 SLA 2012; am § 18 ch 74 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018; am §§ 16 — 20 ch 101 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of section in 2025. —

Under secs. 21 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor's notes. —

In 1991, to harmonize the amendments made by chs. 21 and 71, SLA 1991, the words “by an Alaska” were inserted before “university foundation” in (a) of this section.

In 2010, in (d)(2) of this section “AS

21.96.070

,

21.96.075

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.070,

21.89.075

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

.

In 2010 and 2018, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; subsection (e) was enacted as (f) in 2010 and subsection (f) was enacted as (g) in 2018.

In 2012, in (d)(2) of this section, “ AS

43.20.145

” was substituted for “ AS

43.20.073

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of
AS

43.20.073

.

In 2018, “AS

21.96.075

,” was deleted from paragraph (d)(2) to harmonize the repeal of AS

21.96.075

by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, effective January 1, 2019, with the changes made by ch. 101, SLA 2018.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective January 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which provided for oil or gas property education credits.

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, in- serted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tourna- ment” in (a)(4), added (a)(5) and (a)(6), and made a related change.

The first 2012 amendment, effective March 24, 2012, in (f)(1) [now (g)(1)], substituted “AS

43.20.014

” for “AS

14.03.126

”.

The second 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, added (a)(7), and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “contributions of cash or equipment” for “cash contributions”, in (a)(1), inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation” in (a)(4), deleted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” following “a facility” and inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”; in (b)(2), substituted “75 percent” for “100 percent” at the beginning; in (d)(2), twice substituted “$1,000,000” for “$5,000,000”; added (g) [now (f)].

The 2018 amendment,
effective
January 1, 2021,
rewrote (b).

Sec. 43.56.019.
Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund contribution credit. [Repealed, § 25 ch 46 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 43.56.020.
Exemptions.

The following are exempt from local taxes levied or authorized under AS

43.56.010(b)

:

property rights attached to or inherent in the right to explore for or produce oil or gas;

oil or gas leases or properties, whether producing or not;

oil or gas in place;

oil or gas produced or extracted in the state;

the value of intangible drilling expenses and exploration expenses;

an interest in property described in AS

43.55.017(a)

.

There is exempt from state taxes levied or authorized under AS

43.56.010(a)

, before the construction commencement date, property that is committed by contract or other agreement for use in this state primarily for the production or pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil, or in the operation or maintenance of facilities for the production or pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil.

In (a)(2) of this section, “properties” means mineral interests in oil and gas and working interests, royalty interests, and overriding royalty interests in oil and gas leases.

Taxable property of a natural gas pipeline project owned or financed by the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation or a joint venture, partnership, or other entity that includes the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation is exempt from state taxes levied or authorized under AS

43.56.010(a)

and municipal taxes levied or authorized under AS

43.56.010(b)

before the commencement of commercial operations of that natural gas pipeline project. In this subsection, “commencement of commercial operations” means the first flow of natural gas in the project that generates revenue to the owners of the natural gas pipeline project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 26 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 119 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 22 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A municipality may not levy a transportation tax on crude oil flowing through the Trans Alaska Pipeline
while the crude oil passes through the municipality. November 15, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.56.030.
In place of other taxes.

Except for those taxes imposed under AS 43.55, the taxes levied or authorized under AS

43.56.010(b)

are in place of

all other ad valorem taxes or other taxes imposed by a municipality on property subject to tax under this chapter or exempted from taxation by AS

43.56.020

; and

all other taxes imposed by a municipality on or with respect to the property subject to tax under this chapter or exempted from taxation by AS

43.56.020

, including, but not limited to,

taxes on the retail sale or use of the property except for the retail sales tax on the first $1,000 of each sale;

taxes on the sale or use of gas or unrefined oil;

taxes on the sale or use of services used in or associated with the property or in its maintenance or operation except for the sales tax on the first $1,000 of each sale;

taxes on or measured by gross or net income from the property, including income from the exploration for, production of, or pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil or property; and

any license, excise, fee, charge or other tax on or pertaining to the property or services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 55 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 34 SLA 1999)

Sec. 43.56.040.
State Assessment Review Board.

The State Assessment Review Board is created within the department.
The board consists of five persons appointed by the governor to serve at the pleasure of the governor, each of whom must be knowledgeable of assessment procedures.
Each board member is subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.050.
Per diem and expenses.

Members of the board shall receive per diem and expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 43.56.060.
Assessment.

The department shall assess property for the tax levied under AS

43.56.010(b)

and AS

29.45.080

on property used or committed by contract or other agreement for use for the pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil or for the production of gas or unrefined oil at its full and true value as of January 1 of the assessment year.

The department shall assess property for the taxes levied under AS

43.56.010(a)

at its full and true value as of January 1 of the assessment year except that in the case of taxable property used or committed by contract or other agreement for the pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil or for the production of gas or unrefined oil to be transported by that pipeline, the first assessment date shall be the construction commencement date. If the construction commencement date is used as the assessment date, the tax payable shall be prorated on the basis of the assessment year remaining.

The full and true value of taxable property used or committed by contract or other agreement for use in the exploration for gas or unrefined oil, or in the operation or maintenance of facilities for the exploration for gas or unrefined oil, is the estimated price that the property would bring in an open market and under the then prevailing market conditions in a sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer both conversant with the property and with prevailing general price levels.

The full and true value of taxable property used or committed by contract or other agreement for the production of gas or unrefined oil or in the operation or maintenance of facilities for the production of gas or unrefined oil is:

on the construction commencement date the actual cost incurred or accrued with respect to the property as of the date of assessment;

determined on each January 1 thereafter on the basis of replacement cost less depreciation based on the economic life of proven reserves.

The full and true value of taxable property used or committed by contract or other agreement for pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil or in the operation or maintenance of facilities for the pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil is:

on the construction commencement date and until January 1 following the date the pipeline begins to transport gas or unrefined oil, the actual cost incurred or accrued with respect to the property as of the date of assessment;

determined on each January 1 thereafter with due regard to the economic value of the property based on the estimated life of the proven reserves of gas or unrefined oil then technically, economically, and legally deliverable into the transportation facility; however, if the proven reserves of gas or unrefined oil then technically, economically, and legally deliverable indicate an economic life materially shorter than the estimated physical life of the transportation facility, the full and true value is the actual cost reduced by an annual allowance for depreciation on a straight line basis over an economic life based on the actual elapsed life from the commencement of full operation to the date of assessment plus the estimated remaining life of the proven reserves of gas and unrefined oil then technically, economically, and legally deliverable into the transportation facility as of the date of the assessment;

on the assessment date next following inability to use or construct all or a substantial part of the facility for a period of 90 or more consecutive days because of natural disaster or legal prohibition, or other events beyond the control of a person having ownership or control of the property, adjusted to take into account any diminution in value.

For purposes of this section, “actual cost” and “replacement cost” do not include interest capitalized before or during the period of construction nor the value of intangible drilling expenses. In the case of taxable property under construction, “actual cost” for purposes of this section means the costs incurred or accrued with respect to the property as of the date of assessment.

The department may enter into agreements with a municipality for the cooperative or joint administration of the assessing authority conferred on the department by this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 72 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.070.
Returns.

The department may require by notice every person having ownership or control of an interest in property taxable under this chapter to submit a return in the form prescribed by the department, based on property values existing on January 1 of each year, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

The department by written notice may require a person to provide additional information within 30 days of the notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.080.
Investigation.

The department may make an investigation of property on which a return has been filed or of taxable property upon which no return has been filed. In either case, the department may make its own valuation of the taxable property, which is prima facie evidence of full and true value.

An employee or agent of the department may enter any premise necessary for the investigation during reasonable hours and may examine property and appropriate records. The owner of the taxable property upon request shall furnish to the employee or agent of the department reasonable assistance required for the investigation. If refused entry, the department may seek a court order to compel entry.

For the purpose of the investigation the owner of the taxable property or a representative of the owner may be required to appear for examination under oath by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.090.
Assessment roll.

The department shall prepare annually the assessment roll for taxation under this chapter.
The roll must contain:

a description of all taxable property;

the assessed value of all taxable property;

the names and addresses of persons owning property subject to assessment and taxation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 43.56.100.
Assessment notice.

On or before March 1 of each year, the department shall send to every owner of taxable property named in the assessment roll a notice of assessment, showing the assessed value of the property. Notice of assessment is effective on the date of mailing.

The department shall send to a municipality a copy of the notice of assessment on any taxable property that is assessed under the provisions of this chapter and that is located in the municipality and on which a tax is authorized under AS

43.56.010(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.110.
Appeal to the department.

An owner of taxable property or a municipality receiving an assessment notice may object to the assessment by advising the department in writing of the objections to the assessment within 20 days of the effective date of the notice.

The department shall provide by regulation for notices of appeals to interested persons and municipalities.

Following an objection the department may adjust the assessment and the assessment roll. An adjustment based on an objection from an owner of taxable property or a municipality shall be made within 30 days of the effective date of the notice of assessment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.120.
Appeal to the board.

After a ruling by the department on an appeal made under AS

43.56.110

, the owner or a municipality may further appeal to the board. The appeal must be filed in writing within 50 days of the effective date of the notice of assessment.

The board shall provide by regulation for notices of appeals to interested persons and municipalities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.130.
Hearings of the board.

The board shall hear appeals filed under AS

43.56.120(a)

.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum required to transact business.

The board shall provide by regulation for notices of hearings to interested persons and municipalities.

If an appellant fails to appear at the hearing, the board may proceed with the hearing in the absence of the appellant.

The appellant bears the burden of proof at the hearing.

The only grounds for adjustment of assessed value is proof of unequal, excessive, or improper valuation or valuation not determined in accordance with the standards set out in this chapter, based on facts stated in a written appeal timely filed or proved at the hearing.

The board shall certify its determinations to the department within seven days of the hearing.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 107 SLA 1976.]

An owner or municipality may appeal to the superior court for, and is entitled to, trial de novo of the board’s action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 5 ch 107 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.135.
Certification.

No later than June 1 of each year, the department shall certify the final assessment roll and mail to the owner of the taxable property or an authorized agent a statement of the amount of tax due.

History.

(§ 4 ch 107 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.140.
Supplementary assessment rolls.

The department shall include property omitted from the assessment roll on a supplementary roll, using the procedures set out in this chapter for the original roll.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.150.
Collection and deposit.

The tax levied by AS

43.56.010(a)

is payable to the department on or before June 30 of the taxable year.

The department may provide for voluntary prepayment and for payment by installments.

The tax levied under AS

43.56.010(a)

, interest and penalties collected with respect to this levy shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 3 ch 107 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.160.
Interest and penalty.

When the tax levied by AS

43.56.010(a)

becomes delinquent, a penalty of 10 percent shall be added. Before January 1, 2014, interest on the delinquent taxes, exclusive of penalty, shall be assessed at a rate of eight percent a year. On and after January 1, 2014, interest on the delinquent taxes, exclusive of penalty, shall be assessed at the rate specified in AS

43.05.225

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 30 ch 10 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.170.
Lien for tax.
[Repealed, § 4 ch 84 SLA 1976.
For current law, see AS 43.10.035.]

Sec. 43.56.180.
Remedy.

The remedy of distraint of property set out in AS

43.20.270

applies to the tax levied by AS

43.56.010(a)

.
However, only property subject to the tax may be distrained.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 43.56.190.
Penalties. [Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.
For current law, see AS 43.05.290.]

Sec. 43.56.200.
Regulations.

The board and the department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) as appropriate to carry out their respective duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

Sec. 43.56.210.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means State Assessment Review Board;

“construction commencement date” means the earlier of April 1, 1974 or the date the following occur:

there has been issued to the owner or an agent of the owner right-of-way permits, leases, and title and other rights in land, and other approvals, permits, licenses, and certificates, by federal, state and local agencies that a reasonable and prudent person would consider adequate to commence construction of the facilities in the expectation that all other approvals, permits, licenses, and certificates necessary for the completion of facilities will be obtained;

all approvals, permits, licenses, and certificates are in full force and effect, unrevoked, and without any modification that might jeopardize the completion or continued construction of the facilities; and

no order, judgment, decree, determination, or award of a federal, state, or local court or administrative or regulatory agency enjoining, either temporarily or permanently, the construction or the continuation of construction of the facilities is in effect;

“gas” includes all natural gas and all hydrocarbons produced at the wellhead not defined as oil;

“intangible drilling expenses” means those expenses defined in 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code) as defined on January 1, 1974;

“taxable property”

means real and tangible personal property used or committed by contract or other agreement for use within this state primarily in the exploration for, production of, or pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil (except for property used solely for the retail distribution or liquefaction of natural gas), or in the operation or maintenance of facilities used in the exploration for, production of, or pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil; “taxable property” includes

machinery, appliances, supplies, and equipment;

drilling rigs, wells (whether producing or not), gathering lines and transmission lines, pumping stations, compressor stations, power plants, topping plants, and processing units;

roads, tank farms, tanker terminals, docks and other port facilities, and air strips;

aircraft and motor vehicles owned by a person whose principal business in the state is the exploration for, production of, or pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil and whose operation of the aircraft or motor vehicle directly relates to the conduct of that business;

maintenance equipment and facilities, and maintenance camps and other related facilities; and

communications facilities owned by a person whose principal business in the state is the exploration for, production of, or pipeline transportation of gas or unrefined oil and whose operation of the communications facilities directly relates to the conduct of that business;

does not include

permanent residences;

office buildings requiring substantial local government services;

oil and gas pipeline systems owned and operated by a public utility that is certificated under AS

42.05.221

and is regulated by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska;

aircraft and motor vehicles, except aircraft and motor vehicles taxable under (A)(iv) of this paragraph; and

communications facilities, except communications facilities taxable under (A)(vi) of this paragraph;

“unrefined oil” includes crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons regardless of gravity that are produced at the wellhead in liquid form and the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas other than gas produced in association with oil and commonly known as casinghead gas.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 1973; am § 27 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 8 ch 136 SLA 1977; am § 41 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 110 SLA 1981; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 117 SLA 1981; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 2002 to reflect the 1985 repeal of former paragraph (6) and the 1990 repeal of former paragraph (3).

In 1999, in (5)(B)(iii) [formerly (7)(B)(iii)] of this section “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.